Illinois, session 104th, SB2224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 21-1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/21-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 21-1)7    Sec. 21-1. Choosing and election of electors of President 8and Vice-President of the United States shall be in the 9following manner:10    (a) In each year in which a President and Vice-President 11of the United States are chosen, each political party or group 12in this State shall choose by its State Convention or State 13central committee one elector electors and alternate electors 14of President and Vice-President of the United States from each 15congressional district and such State Convention or State 16central committee of such party or group shall also choose 2 17electors at large and alternate electors at large, if any are 18to be appointed for this State and such State Convention or 19State central committee of such party or group shall by its 20chair and secretary certify the total list of such electors 21and alternate electors together with electors at large and 22alternate electors at large so chosen to the State Board of 23Elections.  SB2224- 2 -LRB104 05561 SPS 15591 b1    The filing of such certificate with the Board, of such 2choosing of electors and alternate electors shall be deemed 3and taken to be the choosing and selection of the electors and 4alternate electors for the individual congressional districts 5of this State, if such party or group is successful at the 6polls in the individual congressional district as herein 7provided in choosing their candidates for President and 8Vice-President of the United States.9    (b) The names of the candidates of the several political 10parties or groups for electors and alternate electors of 11President and Vice-President shall not be printed on the 12official ballot to be voted in the election to be held on the 13day in this Act above named. In lieu of the names of the 14candidates for such electors and alternate electors of 15President and Vice-President, immediately under the 16appellation of party name of a party or group in the column of 17its candidates on the official ballot, to be voted at said 18election first above named in subsection (1) of Section 2A-1.2 19and Section 2A-2, there shall be printed within a bracket the 20name of the candidate for President and the name of the 21candidate for Vice-President of such party or group with a 22square to the left of such bracket. Each voter in this State 23from the several lists or sets of electors and alternate 24electors so chosen and selected by the said respective 25political parties or groups, may choose and elect an elector 26one of such lists or sets of electors and alternate electors by   SB2224- 3 -LRB104 05561 SPS 15591 b1placing a cross in the square to the left of the bracket 2aforesaid of one of such parties or groups. Placing a cross 3within the square before the bracket enclosing the names of 4President and Vice-President shall not be deemed and taken as 5a direct vote for such candidates for President and 6Vice-President, or either of them, but shall only be deemed 7and taken to be a vote for the elector entire list or set of 8electors and alternate electors chosen by that political party 9or group for that congressional district so certified to the 10State Board of Elections as herein provided. Voting by means 11of placing a cross in the appropriate place preceding the 12appellation or title of the particular political party or 13group, shall not be deemed or taken as a direct vote for the 14candidates for President and Vice-President, or either of 15them, but instead to the Presidential vote, as a vote for the 16elector entire list or set of electors and alternate electors 17chosen by that political party or group so certified to the 18State Board of Elections as herein provided.19    (c) Such certification by the respective political parties 20or groups in this State of electors and alternate electors of 21President and Vice-President shall be made to the State Board 22of Elections within 2 days after such State convention or 23meeting of the State central committee in which the electors 24and alternate electors were chosen.25    (d) Should more than one certificate of choice and 26selection of electors and alternate electors of the same   SB2224- 4 -LRB104 05561 SPS 15591 b1political party or group be filed by contesting conventions or 2contesting groups, it shall be the duty of the State Board of 3Elections within 10 days after the adjournment of the last of 4such conventions to meet and determine which set of nominees 5for electors and alternate electors of such party or group was 6chosen and selected by the authorized convention of such party 7or group. The Board, after notice to the chair and secretaries 8or managers of the conventions or groups and after a hearing 9shall determine which elector set of electors and alternate 10electors was so chosen for each congressional district by the 11authorized convention and shall so announce and publish the 12fact, and such decision shall be final and the set of electors 13and alternate electors so determined upon by the electoral 14board to be so chosen shall be the list or set of electors and 15alternate electors to be deemed elected if that party shall be 16successful at the polls in each congressional district, as 17herein provided.18    (e) Should a vacancy occur in the office of elector, such 19vacancy shall be filled in accordance with Section 25 of the 20Uniform Faithful Presidential Electors Act.21    (f) Each congressional district presidential elector shall 22cast his or her ballot for the Presidential and Vice 23Presidential candidate who received the highest number of 24votes in his or her congressional district. Each elector at 25large shall cast his or her ballot for the Presidential and 26Vice Presidential candidate who received the highest number of   SB2224- 5 -LRB104 05561 SPS 15591 b1votes in the State. 2(Source: P.A. 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.)